Hawaii, session 2025, SB880.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that low-income subsidy programs such as medicare, medicaid, a medicare savings program, and Extra Help, can help reduce out-of-pocket costs for individuals with limited income by offsetting their medical and prescription drug costs, such as premiums, deductibles, copayments, coinsurance, and lifetime late enrollment penalties.  The legislature further finds that although individuals with low income, those who speak English as a second language, or those who live in rural areas may qualify for these programs, they may have no or limited access to the benefits, as they may not be aware of or need assistance with the application or eligibility renewal process. The legislature further finds that the Hawaii state health insurance assistance program, administered by the executive office on aging of the department of health, provides free information and one-on-one counseling on medicare.  Since 2022, the program has been receiving a significantly higher volume of referrals from med-QUEST to assist uninsured or underinsured individuals who are losing their medicaid eligibility and need to find other health coverage.  The overflow and referrals are made to community partners within forty-eight hours to help with food, housing, utilities, employment, and other needs. The legislature also finds that during the COVID-19 pandemic, the med-QUEST division of the department of human services paused disenrollments based on eligibility issues and all medicaid members received continuous uninterrupted coverage through March 2023, regardless of their change in eligibility.  Following the 2023 Maui wildfires, the med-QUEST division again paused all eligibility disenrollments statewide until the end of 2023. However, the med-QUEST division has resumed its annual eligibility redetermination process, and therefore, people have been or will be receiving notices and forms to renew their coverage. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish within the Hawaii state health insurance assistance program a temporary medi-medi project to assist the underserved population in the State who may qualify for various low-income subsidy programs to gain access to their benefits. SECTION 2. (a)  There is established within the Hawaii state health insurance assistance program a medi-medi project to assist older adults, medicare beneficiaries, individuals with disabilities, and other underserved populations who may qualify for various low-income subsidy programs such as medicare, medicaid, medicare savings programs, and Extra Help, to gain access to their benefits. (b)  The medi-medi project shall: (1)  Develop and implement a community outreach program; (2)  Streamline the application and eligibility renewal process for various low-income subsidy programs; and (3)  Provide any other service it deems necessary for the underserved populations in the State to gain access to benefits under various low-income subsidy programs. (c)  The executive office on aging shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations regarding the medi-medi project, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session. (d)  The medi-medi project shall cease to exist on           . SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the Hawaii state health insurance assistance program, to be expended as follows: 1.  $ for the establishment of one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) position to implement and administer the medi-medi project; and 2.  $ for other operating expenses. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the executive office on aging for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________